apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="sml/ouva__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ouva</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvu</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvy</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvě</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvě</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvou</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvo</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvy</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvy</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>uv</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvám</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvách</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvama</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvami</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ouvy</l><r>ouva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="avi/um__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>í</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ím</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ích</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ama</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sk/ála__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ála</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>álu</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ály</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ále</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ále</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alou</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>álou</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>álo</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ály</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ály</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>al</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alám</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>álám</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alách</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>álách</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alami</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>álami</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ály</l><r>ála<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žid__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ů</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ům</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ech</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ama</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="diplomat"><i>diplomat</i><par n="žid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="opat"><i>opat</i><par n="žid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="parazit"><i>parazit</i><par n="žid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gymnázium"><i>gymnázi</i><par n="avi/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="manžel"><i>manžel</i><par n="žid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="muzeum"><i>muze</i><par n="avi/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="občan"><i>občan</i><par n="žid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skála"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ála__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="smlouva"><i>sml</i><par n="sml/ouva__n_f"/></e>
